Virginia statutes. Title 8.7. Commercial Code — Warehouse Receipts, Bills of Lading and Other Documents of Title.
PART 2. Warehouse Receipts: Special Provisions.

§ 8.7-201.
Who may issue a warehouse receipt; storage under government bond.

A warehouse receipt may be issued by any warehouseman.

Where goods including distilled spirits and agricultural commodities are stored under a statute requiring a bond against withdrawal or a license for the issuance of receipts in the nature of warehouse receipts, a receipt issued for the goods has like effect as a warehouse receipt even though issued by a person who is the owner of the goods and is not a warehouseman.

History.

Code 1950, § 61-4; 1964, c. 219.

§ 8.7-202.
Form of warehouse receipt; essential terms; optional terms.

A warehouse receipt need not be in any particular form.

Unless a warehouse receipt provides for each of the following, the warehouseman is liable for damages caused by the omission to a person injured thereby:

the location of the warehouse where the goods are stored;

the date of issue of the receipt;

the consecutive number of the receipt;

a statement whether the goods received will be delivered to the bearer, to a specified person, or to a specified person or his order;

the rate of storage and handling charges, except that where goods are stored under a field warehousing arrangement a statement of that fact is sufficient on a nonnegotiable receipt;

a description of the goods or of the packages containing them;

the signature of the warehouseman, which may be made by his authorized agent;

if the receipt is issued for goods of which the warehouseman is owner, either solely or jointly or in common with others, the fact of such ownership; and

a statement of the amount of advances made and of liabilities incurred for which the warehouseman claims a lien or security interest (§

8.7-209

). If the precise amount of such advances made or of such liabilities incurred is, at the time of the issue of the receipt, unknown to the warehouseman or to his agent who issued the receipt, a statement of the fact that advances have been made or liabilities incurred and the purpose thereof is sufficient.

A warehouseman may insert in his receipt any other terms that are not contrary to the provisions of this act and do not impair his obligation of delivery (§

8.7-403

) or his duty of care (§

8.7-204

). Any contrary provisions shall be ineffective.

History.

Code 1950, § 61-5; 1964, c. 219; 2004, c. 200.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 200 substituted “provides for” for “embodies within its written or printed terms” in the introductory paragraph of subsection (2); substituted “issued the receipt” for “issues it” in subdivision (2)(i); and made a minor stylistic change.

§ 8.7-203.
Liability for nonreceipt or misdescription.

A party to or purchaser for value in good faith of a document other than a bill of lading relying in either case upon the description therein of the goods may recover from the issuer damages caused by the nonreceipt or misdescription of the goods, except to the extent that the document conspicuously indicates that the issuer does not know whether any part or all of the goods in fact were received or conform to the description, as where the description is in terms of marks or labels or kind, quantity or condition, or the receipt or description is qualified by “contents, condition and quality unknown,” “said to contain” or the like, if such indication be true, or the party or purchaser otherwise has notice.

History.

Code 1950, § 61-23; 1964, c. 219; 2004, c. 200.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 200 deleted “of title” preceding “other than a bill of lading.”

§ 8.7-204.
Duty of care; contractual limitation of warehouseman’s liability.

A warehouseman is liable for damages for loss of or injury to the goods caused by his failure to exercise such care in regard to them as a reasonably careful man would exercise under like circumstances but unless otherwise agreed he is not liable for damages that could not have been avoided by the exercise of such care.

Damages may be limited by a term in the warehouse receipt or storage agreement limiting the amount of liability in case of loss or damage, beyond which the warehouseman shall not be liable. On request of the bailor in a record at the time of signing such storage agreement or within a reasonable time after receipt of the warehouse receipt, the warehouseman’s liability may be increased on part or all of the goods thereunder. In this event, increased rates may be charged based on such increased valuation. No such limitation is effective with respect to the warehouseman’s liability for conversion to his own use.

Reasonable provisions as to the time and manner of presenting claims and instituting actions based on the bailment may be included in the warehouse receipt or storage agreement.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 61-6, 61-24; 1964, c. 219; 2004, c. 200.

Editor’s note.

The official text of the Uniform Commercial Code contains the following subsection (4):

“(4) This section does not impair or repeal. . . .”

This language was not enacted since there appears to be no Virginia statute which “imposes a higher responsibility upon the warehouseman or invalidates contractual limitations which would be permissible under this title.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 200 rewrote subsection (2); substituted “storage agreement” for “tariff” in subsection (3); and made a minor stylistic change.

§ 8.7-205.
Title under warehouse receipt defeated in certain cases.

A buyer in the ordinary course of business of fungible goods sold and delivered by a warehouseman who is also in the business of buying and selling such goods takes the goods free of any claim under a warehouse receipt even though the receipt is negotiable and has been duly negotiated.

History.

1964, c. 219; 2004, c. 200.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 200 inserted “the goods” and substituted “the receipt is negotiable and” for “it.”

§ 8.7-206.
Termination of storage at warehouseman’s option.

A warehouseman may on notifying the person on whose account the goods are held and any other person known to claim an interest in the goods require payment of any charges and removal of the goods from the warehouse at the termination of the period of storage fixed by the document, or, if no period is fixed, within a stated period not less than 30 days after the notification. If the goods are not removed before the date specified in the notification, the warehouseman may sell them in accordance with the provisions of the section on enforcement of a warehouseman’s lien (§

8.7-210

).

If a warehouseman in good faith believes that the goods are about to deteriorate or decline in value to less than the amount of his lien within the time prescribed in subsection (1), the warehouseman may specify in the notification any reasonable shorter time for removal of the goods and in case the goods are not removed, may sell them at public sale held not less than one week after a single advertisement or posting.

If as a result of a quality or condition of the goods of which the warehouseman had no notice at the time of deposit the goods are a hazard to other property or to the warehouse or to persons, the warehouseman may sell the goods at public or private sale without advertisement or posting on reasonable notification to all persons known to claim an interest in the goods. If the warehouseman after a reasonable effort is unable to sell the goods he may dispose of them in any lawful manner and shall incur no liability by reason of such disposition.

The warehouseman must deliver the goods to any person entitled to them under this title upon due demand made at any time prior to sale or other disposition under this section.

The warehouseman may satisfy his lien from the proceeds of any sale or disposition under this section but must hold the balance for delivery on the demand of any person to whom he would have been bound to deliver the goods.

History.

Code 1950, § 61-37; 1964, c. 219; 2004, c. 200.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 200 substituted “30” for “thirty” in the first sentence of subsection (1); deleted “for notification, advertisement and sale” preceding “the warehouseman may” in subsection (2); and inserted “or posting” in the first sentence of subsection (3).

§ 8.7-207.
Goods must be kept separate; fungible goods.

Unless the warehouse receipt otherwise provides, a warehouseman must keep separate the goods covered by each receipt so as to permit at all times identification and delivery of those goods except that different lots of fungible goods may be commingled.

Fungible goods so commingled are owned in common by the persons entitled thereto and the warehouseman is severally liable to each owner for that owner’s share. Where because of overissue a mass of fungible goods is insufficient to meet all the receipts which the warehouseman has issued against it, the persons entitled include all holders to whom overissued receipts have been duly negotiated.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 61-25, 61-26; 1964, c. 219.

§ 8.7-208.
Altered warehouse receipts.

Where a blank in a negotiable warehouse receipt has been filled in without authority, a good faith purchaser for value and without notice of the lack of authority may treat the insertion as authorized. Any other unauthorized alteration leaves any tangible or electronic receipt enforceable against the issuer according to its original tenor.

History.

Code 1950, § 61-16; 1964, c. 219; 2004, c. 200.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 200, in the first sentence, inserted “good faith” and substituted “lack” for “want,” and inserted “tangible or electronic” in the last sentence.

§ 8.7-209.
Lien of warehouseman.

A warehouseman has a lien against the bailor on the goods covered by a warehouse receipt or storage agreement or on the proceeds thereof in his possession for charges for storage or transportation (including demurrage and terminal charges), insurance, labor, or other charges, present or future, in relation to the goods, and for expenses necessary for preservation of the goods or reasonably incurred in their sale pursuant to law. If the person on whose account the goods are held is liable for like charges or expenses in relation to other goods whenever deposited and it is stated in the warehouse receipt or storage agreement that a lien is claimed for charges and expenses in relation to other goods, the warehouseman also has a lien against the goods covered by the warehouse receipt or storage agreement or on the proceeds thereof in his possession for such charges and expenses whether or not the other goods have been delivered by the warehouseman. But against a person to whom a negotiable warehouse receipt is duly negotiated a warehouseman’s lien is limited to charges in an amount or at a rate specified on the receipt or if no charges are so specified then to a reasonable charge for storage of the goods covered by the receipt subsequent to the date of the receipt.

The warehouseman may also reserve a security interest against the bailor for a maximum amount specified on the receipt for charges other than those specified in subsection (1), such as for money advanced and interest. Such a security interest is governed by the title on secured transactions (Title 8.9A).

A warehouseman’s lien for charges and expenses under subsection (1) or a security interest under subsection (2) is also effective against any person who so entrusted the bailor with possession of the goods that a pledge of them by the bailor to a good faith purchaser for value would have been valid but is not effective against a person who before issuance of a document had a legal interest or a perfected security interest in the goods and that did not:

deliver or entrust the goods or any document of title covering the goods to the bailor or the bailor’s nominee with:

actual or apparent authority to ship, store, or sell;

power to obtain delivery under §

8.7-403

; or

power of disposition under §§

8.2-403

,

8.2A-304(2)

,

8.2A-305(2)

,

8.9A-320

, or §

8.9A-321(c)

or other statute or rule of law; or

acquiesce in the procurement by the bailor or its nominee of any document.

A warehouseman’s lien under subsection (1) on household goods for charges and expenses in relation to the goods is also effective against all persons if the depositor was the legal possessor of the goods at the time of deposit. The term “household goods” means furniture, furnishings, or personal effects used by the depositor in a dwelling. Such lien shall be effective against a prior security interest that has been otherwise perfected as required by law only to the extent of $150.

A warehouseman loses his lien on any goods that he voluntarily delivers or unjustifiably refuses to deliver.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 61-30 to 61-35; 1964, c. 219; 1974, c. 435; 2004, c. 200.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 200, in subsection (1), inserted “or storage agreement” and “other” in the first sentence, and substituted “warehouse receipt or storage agreement” for “receipt” and “the goods covered by the warehouse receipt or storage agreement or on the proceeds thereof in his possession” for “him” in the second sentence; rewrote subsection (3); redesignated former subdivision (3)(b) as subsection (4); substituted “$150” for “one hundred fifty dollars” in the last sentence of subsection (4); redesignated former subsection (4) as subsection (5); deleted “which he” following “delivers or” in subsection (5); and made minor stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For comment on warehousemen’s liens in light of Flagg Bros. v. Brooks, 436 U.S. 149 (1978).

see 2 G.M.U. L. Rev. 309 (1978).

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 18. Enforcement of Judgments and Decrees. § 18.03 Equity. Bryson.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 98.

§ 8.7-210.
Enforcement of warehouseman’s lien.

Except as provided in subsection (2), a warehouseman’s lien may be enforced by public or private sale of the goods in bloc or in parcels, at any time or place and on any terms which are commercially reasonable, after notifying all persons known to claim an interest in the goods. Such notification must include a statement of the amount due, the nature of the proposed sale and the time and place of any public sale. The fact that a better price could have been obtained by a sale at a different time or in a different method from that selected by the warehouseman is not of itself sufficient to establish that the sale was not made in a commercially reasonable manner. If the warehouseman either sells the goods in the usual manner in any recognized market therefor, or sells at the price current in such market at the time of his sale, or has otherwise sold in conformity with commercially reasonable practices among dealers in the type of goods sold, he has sold in a commercially reasonable manner. A sale of more goods than apparently necessary to be offered to insure satisfaction of the obligation is not commercially reasonable except in cases covered by the preceding sentence.

A warehouseman’s lien on goods other than goods stored by a merchant in the course of his business may be enforced only as follows:

All persons known to claim an interest in the goods must be notified.

The notification must include an itemized statement of the claim, a description of the goods subject to the lien, a demand for payment within a specified time not less than 10 days after receipt of the notification, and a conspicuous statement that unless the claim is paid within that time the goods will be advertised for sale and sold by auction at a specified time and place.

The sale must conform to the terms of the notification.

The sale must be held at the nearest suitable place to that where the goods are held or stored.

After the expiration of the time given in the notification, an advertisement of the sale must be published once a week for two weeks consecutively in a newspaper of general circulation where the sale is to be held. The advertisement must include a description of the goods, the name of the person on whose account they are being held, and the time and place of the sale. The sale must take place at least 15 days after the first publication. If there is no newspaper of general circulation where the sale is to be held, the advertisement must be posted at least 10 days before the sale in not less than six conspicuous places in the neighborhood of the proposed sale.

Before any sale pursuant to this section, any person claiming a right in the goods may pay the amount necessary to satisfy the lien and the reasonable expenses incurred under this section. In that event, the goods must not be sold, but must be retained by the warehouseman subject to the terms of the receipt and this title.

The warehouseman may buy at any public sale pursuant to this section.

A purchaser in good faith of goods sold to enforce a warehouseman’s lien takes the goods free of any rights of persons against whom the lien was valid, despite the warehouseman’s noncompliance with the requirements of this section.

The warehouseman may satisfy his lien from the proceeds of any sale pursuant to this section but must hold the balance, if any, for delivery on demand to any person to whom he would have been bound to deliver the goods.

The rights provided by this section shall be in addition to all other rights allowed by law to a creditor against his debtor.

Where a lien is on goods stored by a merchant in the course of his business, the lien may be enforced in accordance with either subsection (1) or (2).

The warehouseman is liable for damages caused by failure to comply with the requirements for sale under this section and, in case of willful violation, is liable for conversion.

History.

Code 1950, § 61-36; 1964, c. 219; 2004, c. 200.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 200, in subsection (1), deleted “if he” preceding “sells at the price” and “has otherwise sold” in the fourth sentence; deleted former subdivision (2)(b), pertaining to the delivery of notification; redesignated former subdivisions (2)(c) through (2)(f) as subdivisions (2)(b) through (2)(e); substituted “10” for “ten” in (2)(b) and (2)(e); substituted “15” for “fifteen” in the third sentence of subdivision (2)(e); and substituted “the warehouseman’s noncompliance” for “noncompliance by the warehouseman” in subsection (5).

Law Review.

For comment on warehouseman’s liens in light of Flagg Bros. v. Brooks, 436 U.S. 149 (1978).

see 2 G.M.U. L. Rev. 309 (1978).

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 18. Enforcement of Judgments and Decrees. § 18.03 Equity. Bryson.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 27 Property Actions. § 27.13 Trover and Conversion. Friend.